Washington statutes.
RCW 19.373.005

Finding—Intent—2023 c 191.

(1) The legislature finds that the people of Washington regard their privacy as a fundamental right and an essential element of their individual freedom. Washington's Constitution explicitly provides the right to privacy. Fundamental privacy rights have long been and continue to be integral to protecting Washingtonians and to safeguarding our democratic republic.

(2) Information related to an individual's health conditions or attempts to obtain health care services is among the most personal and sensitive categories of data collected. Washingtonians expect that their health data is protected under laws like the health information portability and accountability act (HIPAA). However, HIPAA only covers health data collected by specific health care entities, including most health care providers. Health data collected by noncovered entities, including certain apps and websites, are not afforded the same protections. Chapter 191, Laws of 2023 works to close the gap between consumer knowledge and industry practice by providing stronger privacy protections for all Washington consumers' health data.

(3) With chapter 191, Laws of 2023, the legislature intends to provide heightened protections for Washingtonian's health data by: Requiring additional disclosures and consumer consent regarding the collection, sharing, and use of such information; empowering consumers with the right to have their health data deleted; prohibiting the selling of consumer health data without valid authorization signed by the consumer; and making it unlawful to utilize a geofence around a facility that provides health care services.

[ 2023 c 191 s 2.]